North Dakota, session 69, HB1554.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 54-17.8-06 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
54-17.8-06. North Dakota outdoor heritage advisory board - Members.
1. There is created a North Dakota outdoor heritage advisory board consisting of twelve
members. The governor shall appoint representatives from each of the groups listed in this
section based upon recommendations made by the appropriate group. The advisory board
consists of:
a. Four members from the agriculture community. The governor shall appoint one member
from the North Dakota farm bureau, North Dakota farmers union, the North Dakota
stockmen's association, and the North Dakota grain growers association.
b. Two members from the energy industry. The governor shall appoint one member from the
North Dakota petroleum council and one member from the lignite energy council.
c. Four members from the conservation community. The governor shall appoint the
members from the conservation community at large of statewide conservation groups.
d. One member from the business community from the greater North Dakota chamber.
e. One member from the North Dakota recreation and park association.
2. The governor also shall appoint to the advisory board one representative from each of the
following agencies to serve as ex officio, nonvoting technical members: the department of
parks and recreation, the department of water resources, the game and fish department, the
office of the state forester, and the North Dakota association of soil conservation districts.
3. The term of office of each member of the board is four years and members may not serve
more than two consecutive terms. The terms of office commence on the first day of July. The
initial terms for the advisory board members must be staggered following a method
determined by the board.
4. The advisory board shall select a chairman from among the members. Seven voting members
is a quorum at any meeting.
5. The advisory board shall have at least two regular meetings each year and additional
meetings as the chairman determines necessary at a time and place to be fixed by the
chairman. Special meetings must be called by the chairman on written request of any five
members.
6. The advisory board may not forward a grant application to the commission unless the
application is for funding activities that fulfill the purposes of this chapter and the application

H. B. NO. 1554 - PAGE 2
receives a favorable recommendation from a majority of the advisory board members present
at a meeting at which a quorum is present.
7. Members of the advisory board appointed by the governor serve at the pleasure of the
governor.
SECTION 2. EMERGENCY. This Act is declared to be an emergency measure.

H. B. NO. 1554 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1554 and that
two-thirds of the members-elect of the House of Representatives voted in favor of said law.
Vote: Yeas 90 Nays 3 Absent 1
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that two-thirds of the members-elect of the Senate voted in favor of said law.
Vote: Yeas 45 Nays 2 Absent 0
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State